Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-505
Motor fuel transportation; vehicles; display required; rules and regulations.

Every vehicle used in transporting motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel subject to sections 66-501 to 66-512 and 66-525 to 66-531 shall have the name and address of the owner of the vehicle displayed in the form and manner required by 49 C.F.R. 390.21. The Department of Revenue shall adopt, promulgate, and enforce such rules and regulations as it deems proper and necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of such sections.

Laws 1935, c. 130, § 4, p. 464;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-804;

R.S.1943, § 66-505;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 65;

Laws 1993, LB 440, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 85.